Utah statutes.
32B-13-204.   Specific qualifications for beer wholesaling license.

(1)  The commission may not issue a beer wholesaling license to a person who:

(a)  is disqualified under Section 32B-1-304; or

(b)  does not meet any applicable federal requirement for beer wholesaling.

(2) (a)  The commission may not issue one of the following licenses to a beer wholesaler licensee simultaneously with the beer wholesaling license, and a beer wholesaler licensee may not, directly or indirectly, hold, through a wholly or partially owned subsidiary or otherwise, one of the following licenses:

(i)  a brewery manufacturing license; or

(ii)  a beer retailer license.

(b)  The commission may not issue to a beer retailer, and a beer retailer, directly or indirectly, may not hold, through a wholly or partially owned subsidiary or otherwise, a beer wholesaling license.

(3)  If a person to whom a beer wholesaling license is issued under this chapter no longer possesses the qualifications required by this title for obtaining that beer wholesaling license, the commission may suspend or revoke that beer wholesaling license.

